 “We now have four-month-old mice that no longer have diabetes,” he added.
 According to a warning by Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian Diabetes Association's Clinical and Scientific Affairs Department, the research is still in its early stages.
 Like some other experts, he doubts that diabetes can be cured, noting that these findings do not apply to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, permanent secretary of the Nobel Prize in Literature at the Swedish Academy, publicly said on a Swedish radio station Sveriges that the committee, which failed to contact Bob Dylan directly and inform him that he had won the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, was stopping its attempts to contact him.
 Danius said: "We are not doing anything now. I have called and emailed his closest collaborator and received very friendly responses. At this point, that is enough, of course."
 Previously, Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff noted that this company began with the fact that he did not hear the doorbell in his garage workshop.
 He said he created a doorbell that works off WiFi.
 Siminoff said sales grew after his appearance on the 2013 episode of the show “Shark Tank,” where the panel of investors declined to fund his startup.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the home shopping channel QVC.
 In addition, Ring settled a lawsuit with a competitor, the security firm ADT Corporation.
 Although an experimental vaccine has been found to reduce mortality from Ebola, no drug has yet shown a clear effect in treating the current infection.
 The ZMapp antibody cocktail initially showed promising results in this area, but official studies have shown that it has less benefit in preventing death than previously expected.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning that scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to three other treatment options.
 The U.S. Gymnastics Federation supports the letter from the U.S. Olympic Committee and agrees with the absolute necessity of creating a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that the best interests of our athletes, clubs, and their sports are best served by reforming our organization rather than terminating its certification.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how such abuse, so bravely described by survivors of Larry Nassar, could go unchecked for so long, and supports all necessary and appropriate changes.
 The U.S. Gymnastics Federation and the U.S. Olympic Committee have the same goal — to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for athletes so they can pursue their goals in a safe, positive environment and be empowered with all their rights.
 In the 1960s, Brzezinski was an adviser to John F. Kennedy, then in the administration of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 During the 1976 election, he advised Carter on foreign policy. Then from 1977 to 1981, he served as National Security Advisor, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As national security adviser, he helped Carter in world diplomacy, for example, in the conclusion of the Camp David agreements of 1978, the normalization of US-Chinese relations in the late 1970s, the development of policy in relation to the Iranian revolution, which led to the hostage crisis in 1979, and the invasion of the USSR in Afghanistan in 1979.
 This film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone received nominations in all major categories.
 Gosling and Stone received nominations for Best Actor and Best Actress respectively.
 Among other nominations: "Best Picture", "Director", "Cinematography", "Costume Design", "Film Editing", "Original Music", "Production Design", "Sound Editing", "Sound" and "Original Screenplay".
 Two songs from the film — Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars — were nominated for best original song, and Lionsgate was nominated for 26 awards — more than any other studio.
 Late Sunday, US President Donald Trump, through his press secretary, said that US troops would leave Syria.
 The statement came after Trump held a telephone conversation with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 In addition, Turkey will play a major role in the protection of captured ISIS fighters, which, according to the statement, European states have refused to return home.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, which is already a widely accepted theory, but also provides details that can’t usually be gleaned from fossils, such as color and three-dimensional structure.
 Scientists say that the plumage of this animal was above chestnut-brown in color, and from below - either pale or had carotenoid pigmentation.
 The find also allows us to see the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Since dinosaur feathers lack a well-developed rachis, called a rhamphorhynchus, but still have other distinctive features - beards and beards - researchers came to the conclusion that the rhamphorhynchus most likely appeared later through the evolutionary development of other distinctive features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation and display. Researchers suggested that although this is a young dinosaur tail, the sample represents adult plumage, not chick down.
 The researchers suggested that, despite the fact that this is the tail of a young dinosaur, this specimen has the plumage of an adult individual, and not the down of a chicken.
 Yesterday morning a car bomb exploded near the main police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and wounding more than 20 people.
 The governor's office said 19 of the wounded were police officers.
 Police said the attack was carried out by a suspected ISIS militant.
 They found that the Sun works on the same basic principles as other stars: it was found that the activity of all stars in the system is determined by their brightness, rotation and nothing else.
 The combination of luminosity and rotation is used to determine the number of Rossby waves in a star's plasma flow.
 The lower the Rossby number, the less active the star is in relation to magnetic field reversals.
 Iwasaki often found himself in unpleasant situations while traveling.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a wedding in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates on both frequencies – 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz.
 This will ensure its backward compatibility with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided that the base station has a dual receiver.
 802.11n is much faster than its predecessors, with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duval, who is married and has two teenage children, did not make a great impression on Miller, who was told the story.
 When Miller was asked for comment, he said, "Mike talks a lot during hearings... I was preparing, so I didn't really listen to what he was saying."
 "We will make efforts to significantly reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020 compared with the 2005 level," Hu said.
 He did not give a figure for the budget cuts, saying they would be made based on the productivity of China's economy.
 Hu urged developing countries to "avoid the old pattern of polluting first and then cleaning up."
 He added that "they should not be asked to commit themselves to things that go beyond their stage of development, responsibility and capacity."
 At 12:00 GMT today, the Iraq Study Group presented its report.
 He warns: "No one can guarantee that any plan of action in Iraq in the current situation can stop the religious war, growing violence or the impending chaos."
 The report opens with a call for open debate and consensus-building in the United States about Middle East policy.
 The report is a scathing critique of almost every aspect of the current executive branch policy toward Iraq and an urgent call for an immediate change of course.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be implemented before the end of this year to strengthen Iraq’s borders to prevent hostile interference and to resume diplomatic relations with neighbors.
 Current Senator and Argentina's first lady Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner announced her candidacy for the presidency last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires.
 Ms Kirchner announced her intention to run for president at the Argentine theatre, the same place where she launched her 2005 Senate campaign as a member of the Buenos Aires province delegation.
 The reason for the debate was disagreement over the cost of providing material support and rebuilding buildings after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives jokingly called the "Bush New Orleans deal."
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the fact that the contracts for the reconstruction work were allegedly given to companies with ties to the government.
 More than four million people went to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people present was so great that not everyone could get into St. Peter's Square, where the funeral was held.
 Large television screens were set up in various places in Rome, through which people could watch the ceremony.
 Similar events, which were attended by a large number of people, were organized in many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, in particular in Poland.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies for devoting most of its resources to cases that are easily solved, especially car thefts, in order to boost the agency's success rate.
 Congress began funding the anti-obscenity initiative in the 2005 tax year and determined that the FBI should assign 10 agents to combat adult pornography.
 Robin Utman scored a record number of points in the innings: 70 runs for only 41 pitch, hit 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Middle-order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid performed well and scored a hundred-run partnership.
 However, after losing the captain's calliper India made only 36 runs, losing 7 calliper to complete innings.
 U.S. President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, kicking off his week-long tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng. He then discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong.
 A week after the midterm election defeats, Bush told the public about the expansion of trade with Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed to refer the Clean Air Act to a cross-party committee before second reading, following a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton at the PMO on Tuesday.
 At a meeting with the prime minister, Leighton asked for changes and a "complete rewrite" of the Conservative Party's environmental bill.
 Since the federal government intervened and took over funding of the Mersey Community Hospital in Devonport (Tasmania), the state government and some members of the federal parliament have criticised the move as a ploy ahead of the federal election due in November.
 But Prime Minister John Howard said it was only to protect the hospital from a cut in funding by the Tasmanian government by providing an extra A$45 million.
 According to the latest bulletin, sea level observations indicated an approaching tsunami, and there was clear seismic activity near Pago Pago and Niue.
 There were no reports of serious damage or casualties from Tonga, but there was a temporary power outage, which reportedly prevented Tonga’s authorities from receiving a tsunami warning from the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center (PTWC).
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii, located on or near the coast, were closed Wednesday despite the cancellation of warnings.
 US President George W. Bush welcomed the statement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndro called the North Korean offer "a big step toward the goal of verifiable nuclear disarmament of the Korean peninsula."
 Today in the Atlantic Ocean formed a subtropical cyclone Jerry, this is the tenth named cyclone in this season of hurricanes in the Atlantic.
 According to the National Hurricane Center, at this time, Jerry poses no threat on land.
 The chief of the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain could have breached the damaged levees.
 The ninth ward, flooded 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina, is now underwater because the nearby levee was not high enough to hold back the water.
 Water is poured over the dam on a 100-foot-wide strip.
 Commons administrator Adam Korden expressed his frustration with deletions in his conversation last month with Wikinews.
 “He [Wales] was essentially lying to us from the start. Firstly, by acting as if it was necessary to do so for legal reasons. Secondly, by pretending to listen to us right up until his removal of the images.”
 Public outrage has led to the current development of a content policy for the site, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 The work was mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations of the galaxy in Sagittarius.
 The effect the team was looking for could be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky Way.
 Just as the Moon attracts the Earth, causing tides, so does the Milky Way affect the galaxy in Sagittarius.
 Scientists have been able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as it affects ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, a significant part of the dark matter around the Galaxy is located in the form of an halo and consists of a large number of small particles.
 Television reports show white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities are warning residents living near the plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioning and not to drink tap water.
 According to Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority, the plant was found to have radioactive cesium and iodine.
 Authorities suspect that this indicates a possible breach and leakage in the containers of uranium fuel.
 In the course of research in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal, Dr. Tony Moll was able to detect tuberculosis with exceptionally high resistance to drugs (XDR-TB).
 In an interview, he said the new strain "is very worrying because it causes a very high mortality rate".
 Some patients may have been infected in the hospital, Dr. Moll thinks, and at least two were health care workers at the hospital.
 In one year, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 people in close contact.
 However, the percentage of people with multidrug-resistant tuberculosis in the entire group of tuberculosis patients still seems low; 6000 out of a total of 330,000 infected at this particular moment in South Africa.
 The satellites, each weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at a speed of about 17,500 miles per hour, collided at an altitude of 491 miles above the Earth.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was very powerful.
 They are still trying to determine how big the collision was and how the Earth will be affected.
 The U.S. Strategic Command is searching for debris.
 The results of the analysis of the graphs will be posted on a publicly available website.
 A charge of murder with aggravating circumstances will be filed against a doctor who worked at the Children's Hospital of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, after her mother was found dead in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, Ohio authorities said.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, found in Blue Ash, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the ground in a T-shirt and underwear and apparently in the grip of a strong drug intoxication.
 She sent officers in her black Intrigue Oldsmobile, which was 500 feet away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Saroj Balasubramanian, covered in blood-stained clothes.
 Police said the body had probably been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported in July.
 The carriers are pigs, from which the disease is then transmitted to humans through mosquitoes.
 This outbreak prompted the Indian government to take measures such as setting up pig traps in severely affected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government also promised several million doses of the vaccine against encephalitis, which will help to prepare health facilities for next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to the historically hardest-hit areas this year have been delayed due to a lack of funding and low priority compared to other diseases.
 In 1956, Slaney moved to Sweden, where he began working for the Swedish Postal Company three years later, and became their chief engraver.
 He created more than 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is so well known for its quality and detail that he is one of the few "household names" among philatelists, with some specializing in collecting only his works.
 Its magnificent 2000-year-old millennium mark reproduces the "Great Deeds of the Swedish Kings" by David-Klecker Ernestrale, it is entered in the Guinness Book of World Records.
 In addition, he has been involved in the engraving of banknotes for many countries. Recent examples of his work are the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front of the new $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to the hospital, but soon died.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the accident.
 The car itself was removed from the scene of the accident on the same day at around 12:00 GMT.
 A man working in a garage near the scene of the accident said: "There were children waiting to cross the road, all of them were crying and screaming.
 Everyone ran away from the place where the accident happened.
 Other issues on the Bali agenda include preserving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow with less pollution.
 The UN also hopes to complete the creation of a fund to help countries affected by global warming to deal with its consequences.
 This money can go towards building flood-resilient homes, sustainable use of water resources and diversification of crops.
 Fluck wrote that attempts to silence women about women's health have been unsuccessful.
 She came to this conclusion because of the numerous positive comments and support she received from both women and men who argued that contraception should be seen as a medical necessity.
 When the fight was over, after the wounded were taken to the hospital, about 40 more prisoners remained in the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to correct the situation, but the demands of the prisoners are not clear.
 Between 10:00 and 11:00 p.m. mountain time, the inmates set fire to the yard.
 Soon, guards in protective gear walked into the yard and herded the prisoners into a corner, using tear gas.
 As a result, firefighters extinguished the fire at 23:35.
 After the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal floods, which spread sediments along the river, ceased.
 This sediment was required to form beaches and sandbars, which were the habitat of wild animals.
 This has led to the extinction of two species of fish and the endangerment of two others, including the pallid sturgeon.
 Although the water level will only rise a few feet after the flood, authorities hope that will be enough to restore the eroded sandbars downstream.
 There were no warnings of a tsunami and, according to the Jakarta Geophysical Agency, there will not be one, as the earthquake's magnitude was not 6.5.
 Despite the absence of a tsunami threat, residents began to panic and leave the premises of their companies and their homes.
 Although Winifred was ready to cry during the farewell, she made it clear to her fans that she would return.
 "It's not a farewell. It's a closing of one chapter and opening of a new one."
 According to the final results of the presidential and parliamentary elections in Namibia, the current President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected with a large margin.
 The ruling South West Africa People's Organisation (SWAPO) also retained its majority in the parliamentary election.
 Coalition and Afghan forces moved into the area to secure the site, and another coalition aircraft was sent to provide support.
 The fall occurred in high mountainous terrain, and is believed to have been the result of enemy fire.
 Attempts to search for the crash site are hampered by bad weather and difficult terrain.
 The medical charity Mango, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization said it was the worst outbreak in the country's history.
 Doctors Without Borders spokesman Richard Vigne said: "Angola is heading for its worst outbreak ever and the situation in Angola remains very bad."
 The matches started at 10:00 in perfect weather, and apart from a drizzly morning shower that quickly passed, it was an ideal day for rugby sevens.
 Favorites of the tournament from South Africa started with the right note, when they won a beautiful victory with the score 26-00 over Zambia, which is on the 5th position.
 Looking distinctly worse in their game against their southern sisters, South Africa gradually improved their performance as the tournament progressed.
 They were distinguished by disciplined defense, mastery of the ball and excellent teamwork, and it was clear that it would not be easy to beat this team.
 Official representatives of the authorities of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum say that the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a public danger, since there is an immediate threat of its collapse.
 It was scheduled to be cut down on Tuesday, but an emergency court order saved it.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, which were named "Seven Sisters", is at least 100-250 meters (328-820 feet).
 According to infrared images of the night and daytime temperatures, these are most likely caves.
 During the day they are colder than the surrounding surface, and at night warmer.
 Their thermal characteristics are not as stable as those of large caves on Earth, which often maintain nearly constant temperatures, but they match what would be expected for deep pits in the ground, said Glen Cushing of the U.S. Geological Survey's Planetary Geology Division and the University of Northern Arizona, located in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting is traditionally carried out in a low-tech way: the voter closes himself in a booth and puts a pre-printed sheet of paper with the name of the candidate he has chosen into an envelope.
 After officials verify the voter's identity, he or she drops the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voter list.
 French election laws are quite strict in their procedures.
 Since 1988, ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that there are no envelopes inside at the beginning of the vote and that no other envelopes have been added, except those of those who have been admitted to vote and whose votes have been properly counted.
 Candidates can send their representatives to follow the process. In the evening, the votes are counted by volunteers under strict supervision according to a special procedure.
 The ASUS Eee PC series, previously introduced worldwide with a focus on factors such as cost-saving and functionality, became a hot topic during the month of information technology in Taipei in 2007.
 But the consumer notebook market will change dramatically after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Excellence Award for stability by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China in 2007.
 The station’s website describes the show as “traditional radio theater with a new and outrageously twisted vision!”
 In the initial period of its existence, the show was broadcast only on the website of the long-standing online radio TogiNet Radio, dedicated to radio conversations.
 In late 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary radio station.
 Initially, the show was voiced by amateur actors from East Texas.
 According to reports, the looting continued throughout the night as there were no law enforcement officers on the streets of Bishkek.
 Bishkek was described by one observer as descending into anarchy as groups of people ran through the streets and looted consumer goods stores.
 Some Bishkek residents blamed the protesters from the south for lawlessness.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks (New Zealand) in the match of the Cup of the Three Nations of Rugby Union at the stadium "Royal Bafokeng" in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was 21-20, ending the All Blacks' winning streak at 15 games.
 For "Springbox" this interrupted a five-match losing streak.
 This match was the last for the "All Blacks", who had already won the cup two weeks ago.
 The final match of the season will be held at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week, when the Springboks will play Australia.
 A moderate earthquake occurred on Monday in the western part of Montana at 22:08.
 The U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) and its National Earthquake Information Service have not received any urgent reports of damage.
 The earthquake's epicenter was about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 It was confirmed that the strain of bird flu H5N1, deadly to humans, was infected dead wild duck found Monday in a marsh near Leon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh EU country to be affected by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases with suspected H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for "spreading death, destruction and terror to millions and millions of Earth's inhabitants."
 Atheist Chambers claims that his lawsuit is "not serious" and "anyone can sue anyone".
 The story, told in the French opera by Camille Saint-Saëns, tells of an artist "whose life is governed by his love of drugs and Japan".
 As a result, the actors smoke joints on stage, and the theater itself encourages the audience to join in.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann took fourth, fifth and sixth place, respectively.
 After the results were announced, Gingrich praised Santorum, but was harsh in his criticism of Romney, on whose behalf negative information about Gingrich was broadcast in Iowa.
 Perry said he would return to Texas "to assess the results of tonight's straw poll and determine whether I will continue on in the race," but later said he would continue and would participate in the South Carolina primary on Jan. 21.
 Bachman, who won a straw poll in the city of Ames in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 He was reported to be between 20 and 30 years old. In a statement, Bieber said: "Although I was not present for the tragic incident and was not directly involved, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family."
 The entertainment and news website TMZ believes that the photographer stopped his car on the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to take pictures of the police stopping him before he crossed the road and continued. A California Highway Patrol officer who stopped traffic had to order him to cross back twice.
 Police said the driver of the car that hit the photographer would likely not face criminal charges.
 Given that only eighteen medals could be won in a day, a number of countries failed to reach the podium.
 They include the Netherlands with Anna Jochemsen, who finished ninth in the women's race standing in the super-G, and Finland with Kati Salonen, who finished 10th in the same race.
 Australian Mitchell Gourlay finished eleventh in the men's standing super-G. Czech Ondřej Elinek finished sixteenth in the men's sitting super-G.
 Arlí Vélasquez of Mexico finished 15th among men in the super-G sitting, and New Zealander Adam Hall finished ninth among men in the super-G standing.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and guide athlete Anna Ogarzynska finished thirteenth in the super-G. South Korean skier Pak Chon-Sok finished twenty-fourth in the super-G among men in a sitting position.
 UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are accused of spreading the disease, which started near their military camp.
 According to the lawsuit, waste from the UN camp was not properly sanitized, and bacteria washed into the Artibonite River, one of the largest in Haiti.
 Before the arrival of the troops, the state of Haiti did not face any problems related to this disease since the beginning of the 19th century.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited an independent study that suggests that a UN peacekeeping battalion from Nepal inadvertently brought the disease to Haiti.
 Daniel Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient was admitted to Howard University Hospital in stable condition.
 The patient visited Nigeria, where a number of cases of infection with the Ebola virus were detected.
 The hospital followed infection control protocols, including separate housing of the patient to prevent possible infection of other patients.
 Before "The Simpsons", Simon worked in various capacities on several shows.
 In the 1980s, he worked on such shows as "Taxi," "The Tracey Ullman Show" and "The Tracey Ullman Show."
 In 1989, along with Brooks and Groening, he helped create The Simpsons and was responsible for the first team of writers for the series.
 Despite leaving the show in 1993, he remained an executive producer and still received tens of millions of dollars in fees each season.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that the plane was hijacked.
 Later it was reported that the plane received a threat of a bomb explosion and it was diverted back to Afghanistan, landing in Kandahar.
 Early reports said the plane returned to Afghanistan after it was denied permission to make an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, where an aging fleet is poorly maintained for both civilian and military operations.
 International sanctions have made it impossible to purchase new aircraft.
 Earlier this week, a police plane crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last year, Iran suffered its worst air crash in years when a plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing 168 people on board.
 In the same month another airliner rolled off the runway in Mashhad and crashed into a wall, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The band was scheduled to tour the U.S. and Canada until September 16.
 They canceled the tour after singer Steve Tyler was injured in a fall from the stage during a concert on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie-break after both men saved absolutely every serve in the set.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, but it also required a tie-break after reaching 6-6.
 At the moment, Potro has been given medical attention for his shoulder and he has managed to return to play.
 The program began at 8:30 p.m. local time (or 15:00 UTC).
 Renowned singers from all over the country performed bhajans or devotional songs at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The evening began with singer Sandhu Sharma, followed by Jay Shankar Chaudhary. He presented the chhappan bhog bhajan as well. He was accompanied by singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Then Lakha Singh took over the leadership in singing bhajans.
 Babaji was served 108 plates of chapan-bhog (in Hinduism, 56 different foods, including sweets, fruits, nuts and other dishes, presented to the deity).
 Lakhha Singh performed the Chappan Bhog Bhajan. Singer Raj Khandelwal sang along with him.
 Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the design of the new Nintendo Revolution game console at the main presentation of the "Tokyo Game Show" on Thursday.
 The controller, which looks like a TV remote, uses two sensors next to the user's TV to calculate their position in three-dimensional space.
 By moving the device in the air, players will be able to control actions and movements in video games.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and finished the race soon after the start.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was the leader most of the race, but finished it immediately after the pit stop, probably because of a badly tightened right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher finished the race shortly after Alonso due to a suspension failure, which occurred during numerous overtaking attempts during the race.
 “She is very nice and sings very well,” he said, referring to the transcript of the press conference.
 "I was completely genuinely touched every time we rehearsed it."
 About 3 minutes after launch, the onboard camera showed numerous pieces of insulation foam falling away from the fuel tank.
 However, it is believed that they did not cause any damage to the shuttle.
 NASA's shuttle program manager, N. Wayne Hale Jr., said the foam came off "after a period of time that is of concern to us."
 Five minutes before the start of the fireworks, the wind began to increase, a minute later the wind reached 70 kilometers per hour... Then it started to rain, so strong and large, as if needles were falling on you, then hail fell from the sky, people screamed in panic and collided with each other.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two disabled people in wheelchairs, people just jumped over them and pushed them,” said Armand Versace.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa Nuclear Power Plant, located in Niigata Prefecture, was operating in a standard mode.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. said there were no effects from the quake, and that reactors 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 About 9,400 homes in the region are reported to be without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads have been damaged, railways have been disrupted and the airport in Ishikawa Prefecture is still closed.
 One of the bombs exploded near the governor-general's office.
 Three more bombs exploded near government buildings within two hours.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight people, and official tallies confirm that up to 30 people were injured; but the final figures are yet to be known.
 In the urine samples of animals that died after eating contaminated pet food, both cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 The university researchers said the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the kidneys.
 During the observations, the researchers discovered crystalline formations that occur in cat urine when cyanuric acid and melamine are added.
 When comparing using infrared Fourier spectroscopy, it was found that the composition of these crystals corresponds to the crystals found in the urine of affected domestic animals.
 I don't know if you realize it or not, but most of the goods from Central America were brought into this country duty free.
 Nevertheless, eighty percent of our goods were taxed according to the tariffs in Central American countries.
 It didn't seem to make sense to me; certainly it wasn't fair.
 I tell people that they will be treated the way they treat others.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a law banning the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The law requires that violent video games be sold in California with a sticker that says "18" and that the sale of games to minors be punishable by a $1,000 fine for each violation.
 This morning, the Attorney General, Kier Starmer, a QC, announced that criminal proceedings would be brought against both Hoon and Blair.
 Hoon has resigned and will be replaced in the Cabinet by MP Ed Davey, while MP Norman Lamb will take over Davey's post as Business Secretary.
 Hugh and Price are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The dead were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Caddebec, 21, who was the driver.
 Edgar Vegilla suffered injuries to his hand and jaw, while Christopher Schneider required reconstructive surgery to his face.
 Uki's gun jammed when it was aimed at the fifth man's head. Schneider feels constant pain, he is blind in one eye, he has a part of his skull missing, and his face is reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider gave his testimony via video link from the US Air Force base in his home country.
 In addition to competing on Wednesday, Carpendale took part in two individual competitions at the championships.
 Her first competition was a slalom, in which she failed to finish the first run, and 36 of the 116 competitors had the same result in that race.
 In another race, this time in the giant slalom, she finished tenth among women in the sitting position with a combined time of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 minutes slower than the first-place Austrian Claudia Lesch and 1:09.02 minutes slower than the ninth-place Hungarian Diengye Danie.
 Four skiers in the women's sitting group failed to finish their runs, and 45 of 117 skiers in the giant slalom failed to finish.
 The Madhya Pradesh police have returned the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 Deputy Inspector General D. K. Arya said, "We have arrested five men who raped the Swiss woman and recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 The accused have names Baba Kandjar, Bhuta Kandjar, Rampro Kandjar and Vishnu Kandjar.
 Police chief Chandra Shekhar Solanki said the accused were presented before the judges with their faces covered.
 Although there were three people inside the building at the time the car crashed, no one was injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services freed the driver of the red Audi TT.
 He was initially admitted to James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was later transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 The Edinburgh Sheriff Court subsequently charged Adekoye with the murder of her son.
 She is in custody awaiting charges and a trial, but any testimony could be tainted because her celebrity has been widely exploited by the media.
 This is common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scottish law works differently and the courts found the publication of the photos to be potentially damaging.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee notes that "journalists seem to be treading a very dangerous line in publishing photographs and other details of suspects."
 The Royal Prosecutor’s Office, which is generally in charge of prosecuting, told reporters that no further comments would be made, at least until a verdict is reached.
 The document, according to the leak, would address the dispute over the borders that Palestine wants to establish on the basis of those that existed before the 1967 Six-Day War.
 Other topics reportedly include the future status of Jerusalem, which is holy to both peoples, and the issue of the Jordan River Valley.
 Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley for ten years after the signing of the agreement, while the PNA agrees to a five-year presence.
 The subjects in the extra pest control test were closely monitored by rangers, as the test was observed and evaluated.
 As part of the partnership between NPWS and the NSW Sporting Shooters Association, a hunting program was conducted to recruit qualified volunteers.
 According to Mick O'Flinn, acting director of conservation parks and heritage of the Wildlife and National Parks Service, the four arrows selected for the first shooting operation underwent a comprehensive training and safety briefing.
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) composed of nine members.
 This is the fifth CEP Martey in four years.
 Last month, the presidential commission recommended the previous interim electoral council resign as part of a package of measures to move the country towards new elections.
 The commission was Marthelli’s response to the mass protests against the state regime that began in October.
 These sometimes violent protests were caused by the failure to hold elections, some of which were due to take place as early as 2011.
 There have been about 60 cases of overheating of defective iPod devices, resulting in six fires and four people with minor burns.
 Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of 27 cases involving the devices.
 Last week, the Ministry of Economy, Labor and Industry announced that Apple had informed it of 34 additional cases of overheating, which the company called "non-serious".
 In response, the ministry called Apple's delay in reporting the issue "very regrettable."
 At 7:19 a.m. local time (21:19 GMT on Friday), an earthquake struck in Mariana.
 The Northern Mariana Islands Emergency Management Office said there were no reports of damage in the country.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there was no sign of a tsunami.
 A former Filipino policeman hijacked a tourist bus in Manila, the capital of the Philippines, and took Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza fired his M16 rifle at tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued, and at least six were confirmed dead at this time.
 Six hostages, including children and elderly people, were freed earlier, as well as Filipino photographers.
 Later, the photographers took the place of the elderly woman, as she went to the toilet. Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and began a career in medicine.
 He trained as a midwife and gynaecologist and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 When Liggins was working at the hospital, he began to investigate cases of premature birth.
 His research showed that if you introduce the hormone, it will enhance the maturation of the lungs of the child during fetal development.
 According to Xinhua, on Wednesday, state investigators found two flight recorders, or "black boxes."
 Fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to the moon.
 Here's what Tommy Driemr said: "The Moon was the first Queen of Extreme. She was my first manager. The Moon passed away on the night of two moons. It's already a unique event, like her. A strong woman."
 Dustin "Goldie" Runnells said, "The moon was as rotten as I was... maybe even more rotten... I love her and I'll miss her... I hope she's in a better place."
 Of 1,400 people surveyed in the run-up to the 2010 federal election, the number of those opposed to Australia becoming a republic rose by 8 per cent since 2008.
 Acting Prime Minister Julia Gillard during the 2010 federal election campaign said that Australia should become a republic after the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 34% of those surveyed agree with this view and want Queen Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 The survey showed the following: 29 percent of respondents believe that Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, and 31 percent believe that it does not need this form of state structure.
 The Olympic gold medalist was due to compete in the 100 and 200m freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth Games, but his fitness is now in doubt after he complained of illness.
 He was unable to take the painkillers he needed because they are banned in the Games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at Central Missouri University, discovered the largest known prime number on January 25.
 On Tuesday, it was announced that by early February, several people confirmed this discovery using different hardware and software.
 Comets may have been the source of water delivery to Earth, as well as the source of organic materials that can form proteins and support life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how Earth was formed, as comets have been colliding with Earth for a very long time.
 Cuomo, 53, took office earlier this year and signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage last month.
 He called the rumors "political nonsense and stupidity."
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that, according to the U.S. Federal Aviation Administration, will allow planes to fly more direct routes and save millions of gallons of fuel and reduce carbon emissions each year.
 It uses satellite technology instead of the old ground-based radar technology, which will allow air traffic controllers to more accurately determine the position of aircraft and give pilots more accurate information.
 No additional transport has been brought to Wembley, there will be no stopping of ground trains, and there will be no parking and pick-up points on the surface.
 Fears about transportation shortages prompted speculation that the game might have to be played behind closed doors without fans.
 The study, published Thursday in the journal Science, describes the emergence of a new species of bird on the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Researchers from Princeton University (USA) and Uppsala University (Sweden) reported that due to mating of the endemic Darwin's finch (Geospiza fortes) with the transplanted cactus finch (Geospiza conirostris), a new species evolved in just two generations, although it was believed that this process would take much longer.
 Gold can be given any shape. It can be rolled into very small shapes.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire, which can be twisted and plated. It can be coiled or rolled into coils.
 It can be made very thin and attached to another metal. It can be made so thin that it was sometimes used to decorate hand-painted illustrations in books – the so-called "illuminated manuscript".
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make an indicator using the juice of red cabbage.
 Cabbage juice changes color depending on how acidic or alkaline the chemical is.
 The pH value is determined by the degree of saturation of hydrogen ions (H in pH) of the chemical compound under investigation.
 Hydrogen ions are protons, from which electrons are separated (hydrogen atoms consist of one proton and one electron).
 Get a new mixture by mixing two dry powders in one container, and then with clean wet hands, roll a ball from this mixture.
 The moisture on your hands will react with the top layer, which will be unusual, then a kind of shell will form.
 Almost every house in the cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had a toilet with a flush, connected to a complex sewage system.
 Remaining fragments of sewage systems have been found in the houses of Minoan cities on the islands of Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 Toilets were also in ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In the Roman civilization, toilets were sometimes part of public baths, where men and women bathed together.
 When you call someone thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives a call and almost instantly reflects it back down.
 The satellite was delivered into space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere somewhat distorts our light and view.
 To launch a satellite or telescope into space, a giant rocket more than 100 feet tall is needed.
 The wheel has changed our world in an incredible way. The most important thing that the wheel has done for us is to give us a much easier and faster way to transport ourselves.
 It gave us the train, the automobile, and many other vehicles.
 Under them are a greater number of medium-sized cats that eat prey of moderate size, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 And finally, many small cats (including stray house cats) eat and hunt much smaller animals, such as insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 The secret of their success lies in the niche concept, the special work that each species of cat performs, which keeps it from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The pride consists of one to three adult males, who are related, as well as females and cubs, the number of which can reach thirty.
 Females are usually related to each other and form a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides behave very much like a pack of wolves or dogs — animals that are remarkably similar to lions (but not other big cats) in their behavior and are also very dangerous to their prey.
 As a well-rounded athlete, the tiger can climb trees (though not very well), swim, jump great distances, and pull with the strength of five strong men.
 The tiger belongs to the same genus (Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars, and these four cats are the only ones that roar.
 A tiger's roar is not like a lion's full-throated roar, but more like a barking of sentences from unintelligible words.
 Ocelots love to eat small animals. If the opportunity arises, they will catch monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds. Almost all the animals that the ocelot hunts are much smaller than him.
 Scientists believe that the honey badger follows the trail of animals and finds prey by smell, tracking its movements on the ground.
 They are able to see in the dark with the help of night vision and almost imperceptibly move. Ocelots hunt prey, merging with the surrounding environment, and then rush at the prey.
 When a small group of living organisms (a small population) is separated from the main population from which they originated (for example, if they cross a mountain range or river, or if they move to a new island from which they cannot easily return), they often find themselves in an environment that is different from the one they were in before.
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new population will need different characteristics or changes from what it had before in order to become a strong competitor.
 The original population has not changed at all - it still needs the same adaptations as before.
 Over time, as a new population begins to adapt to a new environment, it begins to look less and less like the rest of the population.
 Over time, through thousands or even millions of years, these two populations will look so different that it will be impossible to tell that they are the same species.
 We call this process speciation, the origin of new species, and it is an essential consequence and a very important part of evolution.
 Plants produce the oxygen that humans breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants feed from the sun by means of photosynthesis. In addition, they cast a shadow.
 We build our houses and make our clothes from plants. Most of our food comes from plants. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The mosasaur was the most fearsome predator of its time, so it was not afraid of anything except other mosasaurs.
 His long jaws were lined with more than 70 sharp teeth, and he had an additional row of teeth on his palate, so that anyone who met him on his way had no chance of escape.
 We don’t know for sure, but it’s possible that his tongue was forked. He ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and may have been a cannibal.
 It also attacked anything that went into the water; even a giant dinosaur like a tyrannosaur would not have been a match for it.
 Although most of their food would be familiar to us, the Romans did have some strange and unusual dishes served at feasts, such as wild boar, peacock, snails and a type of rodent called a porcupine.
 There was another difference: while the poor people and women ate sitting on chairs, the rich liked to have joint feasts, during which they ate lying on their sides.
 The diet of the ancient Romans could not include products that came to Europe from America or Asia in subsequent centuries.
 In particular, they had no corn, tomatoes, potatoes, or cacao, and no ancient Roman had ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built each of the gods a main sanctuary, which was considered the home of the god.
 People made sacrifices to the gods, and priests tried to please the gods' desires in ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open temple courtyard and an inner sanctuary, which only priests could enter.
 Sometimes as elements of the temple were built special towers in the form of pyramids called "zikkurats".
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not particularly important.
 Most of the Jewish family’s life was spent outdoors.
 Women prepared in the yard; the shops were open counters that opened onto the street. Stone was used for the construction of houses.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated. The Norse sagas tell of Erik the Red being banished from Iceland for murder, and, moving further west, he discovered Greenland and gave it its name.
 But regardless of his discovery, the Eskimos were already living there at the time.
 Although each of the countries was Scandinavian, there were many differences between the peoples, rulers, traditions, and histories of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you saw the movie National Treasure, you might think that the Declaration of Independence was printed with a map of treasure on the back.
 However, this is not true. Although something is written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the reverse side of the Declaration of Independence it is written: "The Declaration of Independence was signed on July 4, 1776." The text is written at the bottom of the document and up the legs.
 Although no one knows for sure who wrote it, it is known that at the beginning of its existence this large parchment document (29¾ by 24½ inches) was rolled up for easier storage.
 So it is likely that the record was added simply as a note.
 As a result of Operation Neptune and the subsequent battles, the north of France was liberated, but the south was not.
 It was under the control of the "Vichy" French, who made peace with the Germans in 1940 and worked with the invaders instead of opposing them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France. The invasion was called "Operation Dragoon".
 In just 2 weeks, the Free French and the Americans liberated southern France and headed towards Germany.
 Civilization is a separate culture, the bearers of which is a fairly large group of people living and working together, society.
 The word "civilization" comes from the Latin civilis, meaning "citizen", and is related to the Latin words civis, meaning "citizen", and civitas, meaning "city" or "city-state", and it also expresses the size of society in some way.
 City-states are the precursors of nations. Civilizational culture implies the transmission of knowledge through several generations, a continuous cultural presence and a successive diffusion.
 Small cultures often disappear without leaving any historical evidence, and therefore cannot be recognized as authentic civilizations.
 During the American Revolutionary War, thirteen states, in accordance with the Articles of Confederation, first formed a weak central government, the only body of which was the Congress.
 Congress had no taxing powers, and since there was no national executive or judicial authority, it relied on the states, which often refused to cooperate and enforce its acts.
 He also had no power to repeal state tax laws and tariffs.
 To pass amendments, according to the articles, requires the unanimous approval of all states, but the states have been so irresponsible to the central government that their representatives often have been absent.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German team, is the second most successful team in the world and won the 2006 FIFA World Cup.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby union, cycling, ice hockey, roller derby, and motor racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions. The inhabitants of these regions take part in international competitions and the Olympic Games.
 Japan has approximately 7,000 islands (the largest of which is Honshu), making it the 7th largest island in the world!
 Due to its belonging to the cluster / group of islands, Japan is often called from a geographical point of view an archipelago.
 Taiwan originated many years ago, in the 15th century, when European sailors passing by wrote down the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, or "beautiful island".
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base on the southwest coast of Taiwan, initiating a transformation of indigenous methods of rice production and hiring Chinese workers to work on their rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, Qing (1644-1912) forces took control of western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and in 1885 declared Taiwan a province of the Qing Empire.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded the rights to Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu consists of three main structures, namely the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Room of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings at the edges of the complex have been reconstructed to give tourists a more accurate idea of how they looked originally.
 By 1976, 30% of Machu Picchu had been restored. Restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common format for static photographs is 35 mm, and it was this size that was the dominant size of film at the end of the analogue era.
 It is still being produced today, but more importantly, its aspect ratio has been inherited by the size of digital camera images.
 The 35mm format is actually somewhat confusing, it is 36mm wide and 24mm high.
 The aspect ratio of this format (divided by twelve to get a ratio with small integers) is therefore taken to be 3:2.
 Many common formats (e.g. the APS family) are equal to or close to these proportions.
 Too often used and often ridiculed rule of thirds is a simple recommendation that creates dynamism while maintaining a certain degree of order in the image.
 It says that it is best to place the main object at the intersection of the lines dividing the image into three parts vertically and horizontally (see example).
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful, came under scrutiny.
 For more than a thousand years, Christianity united European states despite differences in languages and traditions.
 Her all-pervading power touched everyone, from the king to the common man.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the church’s money exists for this purpose.
 The center of church authority was based in Rome for more than a thousand years, and such a concentration of power and wealth led many to question whether this dogma was being observed.
 Shortly after the beginning of hostilities, Britain imposed a naval blockade on Germany.
 This strategy proved effective in cutting off vital military and civilian supplies, though this blockade violated universally accepted international laws, as set forth in several international agreements over the past two hundred years.
 Britain has mined international waters to prevent ships from entering entire sectors of the oceans, endangering even neutral vessels.
 As the reaction to this tactic was muted, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 Among most citizens and nations in the 1920s, sentiments such as pacifism and isolationism prevailed.
 Having experienced the horrors and atrocities of the First World War, the states wanted to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States and accepted an offer to work for Edison in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States with four cents in his pocket, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, who had been his boss at his previous job, to Thomas Edison.
 In ancient China, a unique method of designating periods of time was used; each period of China or each family in power was a particular dynasty.
 In addition, between the reigns of each dynasty there was fragmentation and instability. The most famous was the Three Kingdoms era, which lasted 60 years during the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During this period there was fierce fighting between many noble men who were fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms era was one of the bloodiest periods in ancient China, with thousands of people fighting for a place on the throne in the grand palace in Xi’an.
 There are many such social and political effects, such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people, not to a single ruler.
 Also after the Revolution, opportunities for work opened up to all men, which allowed the most ambitious and talented to succeed.
 The same applies to the army, because ranks were based on qualities, not on origin.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working class people in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was very interested in topics unrelated to worldly life. He often visited a cave which became known as "Hira" on Mount "Nur" (light) for contemplation.
 And the cave, which has survived to this day, gives us a very vivid idea of Muhammad's spiritual aspirations.
 The cave is located on the top of a mountain north of Mecca and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 It is very difficult to find even for those who know about its existence. In the cave, a person finds himself in complete isolation.
 There is nothing to see but the pure blue sky above your head and the many surrounding mountains. From the depths of the cave you can see and hear only a very small part of this world.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still exists today.
 The Great Pyramid was built by the Egyptians in the third century BC and is one of many large pyramid-shaped structures built to honor the pharaoh.
 The Giza Plateau, or the Giza Necropolis, in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings, includes several pyramids (of which the Great Pyramid of Giza is the largest), several small tombs, several temples, and the Great Sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs and temples were built in honor of Khufu's wives and relatives.
 The upward V sign looks like a V, and the downward V sign looks like a hook or a square without a bottom.
 "Up" means you should start at the tip and pull the bow forward, and "down" means you should start where your hand holds the bow and pull it back.
 The upward movement of the hammer usually produces a softer sound, while the downward movement of the hammer produces a stronger and more forceful sound.
 You can draw your own stipple, but remember that the stipple is printed for musical reasons and should usually be followed.
 On October 6, 1789, an angry mob of women from the market forced King Louis XVI, Queen Marie-Antoinette, their two young children (11-year-old Marie-Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis-Charles) and the king's sister, Madame Élisabeth, to return to Paris from Versailles.
 They returned to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted threats to the king and queen.
 The crowd of people forced the King and Queen to open the windows wide.
 At some point, one of the crowd waved a royal guardsman’s head, killed at Versailles in front of the terrified queen.
 The military expenses of American imperialism for the conquest of the Philippines were paid by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the American colonial regime to pay for most of the expenses and interest on the bond loans moved on behalf of the Philippine government through the Wall Street banking houses.
 Of course, the superprofits derived from the long exploitation of the Filipinos were the main source of income for American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to their creation.
 The era in which these events took place is called the High Middle Ages, a period of European history covering the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (1000–1300 CE).
 The High Middle Ages succeeded the earlier Middle Ages and preceded the Late Middle Ages, which, according to the accepted view, ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term encompassing a wide range of practical ideas, from technological progress or technological imperative to a strict point of view that the fates of people are driven by fundamental logic associated with the laws of science and their manifestation in technology.
 Most views of technological determinism share two general ideas: that the direction of technological development is virtually impervious to cultural or political influence, and that, in turn, the "effects" of technology on society are due to its own properties, not to society.
 For example, one could say that the automobile is a necessary cause of the development of roads.
 However, the national road network is economically unprofitable for only a small group of cars, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 Mass car ownership also leads to an increase in the number of road accidents, which leads to the invention of new methods of treating the resulting injuries in healthcare.
 Romanticism in many ways included cultural determinism, drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, geography shaped people, and over time, customs and culture arose that, being in harmony with the place of residence of a particular society, were better than arbitrarily imposed laws.
 Just as Paris is called the capital of fashion in the modern world, so Constantinople was considered the capital of fashion in the feudal Europe.
 Fame about it as a center of luxury went about 400 AD and continued approximately to 1100 AD.
 Its status declined throughout the twelfth century, mainly because the Crusaders returned with such luxuries as silk and spices, which were more highly valued than the goods offered in the Byzantine markets.
 At this point, the title of Fashion Capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its peak between the 10th and 11th centuries and the 14th century.
 At first, clothing was strongly influenced by Byzantine culture in the east.
 However, due to slow communication channels, styles in the west can lag 25-30 years behind.
 Own styles began to develop in Western Europe by the end of the Middle Ages. One of the greatest achievements of the time, thanks to the Crusades, was the use of buttons to fasten clothing.
 Natural farming is farming conducted for the production of sufficient food to meet the needs of only the farmer and his/her family.
 Natural farming is a simple, often organic, system of agriculture using seeds from plants that grow in a given ecosystem, along with the use of crop rotation and other relatively simple methods of increasing yields.
 Historically, most farmers have been engaged in agriculture for subsistence, and this is still the case in many developing countries.
 Subcultures bring together like-minded people who feel alienated by society's standards, and allow such people to define themselves.
 Subcultures may differ in age, nationality, social status, place of residence and/or gender of the people who make up the subculture.
 The characteristics that define a subculture as distinctive may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often declare their membership through a distinctive and symbolic use of style, including fashion, mannerisms, and slang.
 One of the most common methods used to illustrate the importance of socialization is to illustrate several unfortunate cases where children, due to lack of proper attention, unfortunate circumstances, or intentional abuse, failed to make contact with adults during their development.
 Such children are called "feral" or "wild". Some feral children were isolated by humans (usually their own parents). In some cases, such rejection of their child was the result of parents' rejection of their child's serious intellectual or physical disability.
 Children living on the streets may have experienced severe forms of abuse or injury before running away or being abandoned.
 Others, it is said, were brought up by animals; some of them lived in the wild state by themselves.
 If he is fully raised by animals instead of humans, a feral child will exhibit behaviors (within physical limitations) that are almost identical to the particular animal that raised him—for example, his fear or indifference to humans.
 While project-based learning should be more simple and engaging, scaffolding is ahead of many technologies.
 Scaffolding is not a teaching method, but rather a form of assistance to those going through a new learning experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 Scaffolding can be both virtual and real. In other words, a teacher is a form of scaffolding, but so is Scribbles in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual scaffolding, which helps in training, is built into the software and is designed to remind, explain and ask questions about procedures that the trainee might find too difficult to handle alone.
 Children are placed under guardianship for a variety of reasons, from homelessness to abuse and even extortion.
 Children should not grow up in an environment where education, care and education are not provided, but grow up.
 We believe the foster care system is safe for children.
 Our foster care system should provide safe housing, loving caregivers, stable education, and reliable health care.
 Foster care should provide all the needs that were lacking in the home from which they were removed.
 The Internet combines elements of both mass and interpersonal communication.
 The distinctive features of the Internet lead to additional scales in terms of approach and satisfaction.
 Thus, the idea that "learning" and "socialization" are important motivating factors for Internet use (James et al., 1995)
 "Personal involvement" and "long-term contact" were also named by Eimme and McCord (1998) as new dimensions of motivation when they studied how people respond to Web sites.
 The use of video recordings has led to important discoveries in the field of interpretation of microexpressions — facial movements lasting a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it is claimed that it is possible to determine whether a person is lying by means of a proper interpretation of his microexpressions.
 In the article "The President's Speech" Oliver Sacks described how people who are unable to understand speech due to brain damage can nevertheless correctly assess the sincerity of the speaker.
 According to his assumption, such abilities to interpret human behavior can be possessed by animals, for example, domestic dogs.
 Research conducted in the twentieth century showed that there are two types of genetic variability: hidden and expressed.
 Mutation introduces new genetic variation, while selection removes it from the set of manifest variations.
 Segregation and recombination with each generation shuffles the variations between the two pools.
 In the savannah, primates with a digestive system like ours have difficulty meeting their amino acid needs from available plant resources.
 Failure to do so will have serious consequences, such as stunted growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The most readily available plant resources would be the proteins found in leaves and legumes, but they are poorly digested by primates like us unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, animal foods (ants, termites, eggs) are not only easily digested, but also represent a rich source of protein, containing all the essential amino acids.
 Given all this, it is not surprising that our ancestors solved the "protein problem" in much the same way as chimpanzees in the savannah do today.
 Sleep disruption is the process of deliberately waking during normal sleep and falling asleep again shortly afterwards (10–60 minutes).
 This can be easily done with a relatively quiet alarm clock to bring you to consciousness without fully waking you up.
 If you find yourself resetting your alarm clock in your sleep, then you can put it on the other side of the room, which will force you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other options that are based on biological rhythms include drinking large amounts of liquid (particularly water or tea, a known diuretic) before bed, which causes the person to wake up to urinate.
 The amount of inner peace of a person is inversely proportional to the amount of tension in his body and soul.
 The lower the voltage, the more positive the life force present in you. Every person is potentially given to gain absolute peace and a sense of satisfaction.
 Everyone can achieve enlightenment. The only thing that stands in the way of this goal is our own tension and negative attitude.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been supplemented with the Mahayana path of love and many techniques of Indian yoga.
 The principle of Tibetan Buddhism is very simple: it consists of kundalini yoga, meditation and the path of all-consuming love.
 The energy of kundalini (the energy of enlightenment) in kundalini yoga is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 The heart of Tibetan meditation is Yoga of Deities. Through the visualization of various deities, the energy channels are cleansed, the chakras are activated and the enlightenment of the mind is achieved.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the US. After the war, disagreements regarding the system, process, and culture led to discord between the countries.
 Two years after the war ended, the former allies became enemies, and the Cold War began.
 It was to last the next 40 years, and it was fought for real, using proxy armies, on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish defence had already been broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganise along the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans became irrelevant almost overnight when about 800,000 soldiers of the Soviet Red Army formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after the seizure of eastern regions of Poland in violation of the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other international agreements, bilateral and multilateral.
 The use of ships to transport goods is certainly the most efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The job of seamen has traditionally been to enable a country to move its people and goods, and to prevent an enemy from doing the same.
 One of the most notable recent examples of this was the company in the North Atlantic during World War II. The Americans tried to transport people and materials across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German navy, using mostly its submarines, tried to stop this movement.
 If the anti-Hitler coalition had failed, Germany would probably have been able to conquer Britain as well as the rest of Europe.
 Goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 Ancient cultures and tribes began to keep them for themselves to have milk, wool, meat and fur.
 Domestic goats were usually kept in herds that roamed the hills or other grazing areas, which were often tended by children or adolescents, a practice that is still common.
 Roads for carts were built in England in the 16th century.
 Although the wagon roads were just parallel wooden planks, they gave the horses the ability to carry larger loads and at a higher speed than the slightly more rutted roads of the time.
 Sleepers were first used a long time ago to keep the rails in place, but it soon became clear that the tracks were more effective with a layer of iron on top.
 This became common practice, but the iron caused more wear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Over time, wooden wheels were replaced with iron ones. In 1767, the first rails made entirely of iron appeared.
 The first known form of transportation was walking, people began to walk straight two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus (which means straight man).
 For their australopithecine ancestors, bipedalism was not so common.
 Bipedal specializations are found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2–3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have walked on two legs as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living more environmentally friendly. We can become members of the environmental movement and even activists to at least alleviate further suffering.
 Typically, it is like treating the symptoms. If we need not just a temporary solution, then we need to find the root of the problems and eliminate it.
 It is obvious that the world has changed a lot under the influence of scientific and technological progress of mankind, and due to overpopulation and extravagant lifestyle of people, the problems have become more serious.
 After passage by Congress on July 4, the handwritten draft, signed by Speaker of the House John Hancock and Secretary of State Charles Thomson, was sent a few blocks away to printer John Dunlap.
 150–200 copies were made overnight, now known as the "Dunlap broadsides".
 The first public reading of this document was made by John Nixon in the yard of Independence Hall on July 8.
 On July 6, one copy was sent to George Washington, who on July 9 ordered it read to his troops in New York. A copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 known Dulap leaflets are the oldest surviving copies of the document. The original manuscript copy has not survived.
 Today many paleontologists believe that one of the groups of dinosaurs survived and lived to our days. We call them birds.
 They are often not considered dinosaurs because they have feathers and are capable of flight.
 But there is still much to be said about birds that still look like dinosaurs.
 They have claws and teeth, lay eggs, and walk on their hind legs like T-Rex.
 Almost all computers in use today are based on the processing of information that is encoded in the form of binary numbers.
 A binary number can have only one of two values, either 0 or 1. These numbers are called "binary digits" or "bits" when using computer jargon.
 It can be difficult to immediately identify oral poisoning. Symptoms such as vomiting are too common to make a quick diagnosis.
 The best sign of internal poisoning may be an open container of medicine or a toxic household chemical.
 Check the label for specific first aid instructions for this particular poison.
 The term "beetle" is used by entomologists formally to refer to a group of insects.
 This concept comes from the well-known since ancient times bed bugs - insects that are well adapted to parasitize on humans.
 Both the predators and bed bugs are nesting species adapted to living in a nest or the dwelling of their host.
 There are approximately 400,000 cases of multiple sclerosis (MS) in the United States, making MS the leading neurological disease of young adults and middle-aged adults.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which consists of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that MS affects twice as many women as men.
 A couple may decide that raising a child is not in their best interest or in the best interest of their child.
 These couples can choose to create an adoption plan for their child.
 When adopting or fostering, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can adopt the child.
 The main purpose of science is to find out how the world is put together, using the scientific method. This method is actually the basis of most scientific research.
 It is not, however, the only one. Scientific research is also guided by experimentation (an experiment is a test used to eliminate one or more possible hypotheses), asking questions, and making observations.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused their attention on the ancient texts and especially on the Bible in Latin.
 In all scientific matters, including psychology, the views of Aristotle were adopted.
 As knowledge of the Greek language deteriorated, the West was cut off from its philosophical and scientific Greek roots.
 Many of the observed rhythms in physiology and behavior are often heavily dependent on the presence of endogenous cycles and their generation by biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms that are not simply a response to external periodic stimuli are found in most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue autonomous cycling for a period of time, even in the absence of external stimuli.
 The Hershey-Chase experiment was one of the first suggestions that DNA was the genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase implanted their DNA into a bacterium using phages, i.e. viruses.
 They conducted two experiments, labeling the radioactive phosphorus of the phage DNA and the radioactive selenium of the phage protein.
 Mutations can cause a wide variety of results, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected stretch of genetic material, and whether the mutated cells are germline cells.
 Only mutations in the germ line can be passed on to children, while mutations elsewhere can lead to cell death or cancer.
 Nature tourism is of interest to those who like to go to nature to enjoy the landscape, including wild animals and plants.
 Among the examples of active recreation at the site are hunting, fishing, photography, birdwatching, visiting parks and learning about the ecosystem.
 An example is visiting, photographing and studying orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning people leave small towns in rural areas to go to their place of work, and they pass by those whose place of work is in the place from which they just left.
 In this active transportation movement, everyone is connected to and supports a personal vehicle-based transportation system in some way.
 Science now indicates that the vast hydrocarbon economy has affected one of the stable states of the biosphere that has supported human evolution for the last two million years.
 Everyone is a member of society and uses transportation systems. Practically everyone complains about these systems.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear complaints about the quality of water or falling bridges.
 Why do transportation systems receive so many complaints, why do they fail every day? Are transportation engineers simply incompetent, or are there more fundamental reasons?
 The study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and their interaction with each other is carried out within the framework of the study of traffic flows.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study the intensity of traffic, because you can not predict the behavior of the driver with one hundred percent probability.
 Fortunately, the behavior of drivers is often quite systematic; thus, traffic flows generally have some systematicity and can be approximated mathematically.
 To better represent the traffic flow, the relationships between three main variables were established: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 These relationships help in the planning, design, and operation of railroad facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to take to the air, and their ability to fly helped them escape enemies, find food and find mates.
 Most insects have the ability to fold their wings along their bodies, which gives them an advantage.
 This provides them with more hiding places in which to hide from predators.
 Dragonflies and damselflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system revolves around the sun.
 Many believed him to be right, but many believed the opposite: that the solar system revolved around the Earth, including the Sun (and even other stars).
 This seems like a reasonable idea because we don't feel the Earth moving, do we?
 The Amazon River is the second longest and the largest river on Earth, carrying more than 8 times the water of the second longest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest river on Earth, with a width that sometimes reaches six miles.
 As much as 20 percent of the water that flows from the rivers of our planet into the oceans flows from the Amazon.
 The main river of the Amazon is 6,387 km (3,980 mi) long. Thousands of smaller rivers flow into it.
 Although the construction of pyramids of stone continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the size and technical perfection of the pyramids at Giza was never surpassed.
 In the new kingdom of the ancient Egyptians, they admired the monuments created by their predecessors more than a thousand years ago.
 The Vatican City State has a population of about 800 people, making it the smallest independent country in the world, as well as the country with the smallest population.
 The Vatican uses Italian in its legislation and official communications.
 Italian is also the everyday language for most people working in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of Vatican City are Catholic.
 Since ancient times, people have known the main chemical elements, such as gold, silver and copper, because they can be found in nature in their pure form and relatively easy to extract with the help of primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle believed that everything is made up of a mixture of one or more of the four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 They were like four states of matter (in the same order): solid, liquid, gas and plasma, though he also suggested that they transitioned into a new state to make what we see.
 Alloys are essentially mixtures of two or more metals. Remember that there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Elements such as calcium and potassium are considered metals. Of course, there are also metals such as silver and gold.
 It is also possible to make alloys that contain small amounts of nonmetallic elements such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly tiny that trillions of them could fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 Thus, the pencil became a good friend for many people when it appeared.
 It is sad that when new ways of writing appeared, the pencil lost its former status and was used less.
 Now people type messages on computer screens, and they never have to deal with a typewriter.
 One can only guess what will happen to the keyboard, with the advent of more new technologies.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that in order for many protons and neutrons to be in one nucleus, energy is needed.
 It's like pushing a heavy trolley uphill. Then the re-splitting of the nucleus releases some of this energy.
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus, meaning they tend to decay with little or no influence.
 The surface of the Moon is made up of rocks and dust. The outer layer of the Moon is called the crust.
 The thickness of the crust is about 70 km under the oceans and 100 km under the continents.
 It is thinner under the lunar seas and thicker under the highlands.
 The visible side may have more lunar seas because the crust there is thinner and lava was easier to rise to the surface.
 Content theories focus on finding out what makes people act or what might interest them.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and/or desires that build up inside them as they mature.
 These theories address what causes particular people to want to do what they do, and what their environment causes them to do or not do.
 Two popular theories about content are Maslow's "Needs Pyramid" and Herzberg's "Two-Factor Theory of Motivation."
 Typically, two types of behavior can be seen when managers begin to manage people who were previously their peers. One extreme is the attempt to remain "one of the guys" (or "one of the girls").
 It is difficult for such managers to make unpopular decisions, take disciplinary measures, evaluate the results of work, distribute responsibilities and hold employees accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, a person becomes an unrecognizable individual who thinks he has to change everything the team did and take credit for it.
 After all, the leader is ultimately responsible for the success or failure of the team.
 Such behavior often leads to conflicts between leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams adhere to the same standards of excellence as face-to-face teams, but there are some small differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They are usually more autonomous than employees from traditional teams, because their teams can meet according to different time zones, which the local management may not always understand.
 The presence of a real "invisible team" (Larsen and LaFasto, 1989, p. 109) is also a unique component of the virtual team.
 The "invisible team" is the team of managers, before which each participant reports. The "invisible team" sets the norms for each participant.
 Why would an organization go through the laborious process of creating a self-organizing organization? One of the purposes of applying the concepts of self-organizing organizations in practice is innovation.
 When all available resources are effectively used in all functional units of the organization, creativity and ingenuity can manifest.
 As a result, the organization's concerted effort to overcome the obstacle can lead to a new innovative process that will meet the interests of the client.
 Before an organization can become innovative, managers must create a culture of innovation, knowledge sharing, and learning from experience.
 Angel (2006) explains the Continuum Approach as a method used to help organizations achieve a higher level of effectiveness.
 The data of neuroscience gives physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of consciousness, thus narrowing the field of study and making it much more precise.
 The relationship between brain pathology and behavior is used by scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 The advent of new technologies allows us to see and explore previously unseen structures and processes of the brain.
 This provides us with a large amount of data and materials for creating simulation models that help us understand the processes occurring in our minds.
 Although AI is strongly associated with science fiction, it is a very important area of computer science that deals with the behavior and learning of machines and the "teaching" of them to be intelligent.
 AI research involves building machines that automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Here are some examples that can be cited: control, planning and creation of the schedule, reaction to the diagnoses and questions of the client, as well as recognition of the face, handwriting and voice.
 Such questions are isolated into separate disciplines, the purpose of which is to solve the problems that we face in everyday life.
 Nowadays, AI is often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering and the military, being built into some software applications for home computers and video games.
 Field trips are very important for any class. Very often teachers want to take their students to a place where they can not get on the bus.
 The technology offers a solution with virtual tours, where students can view museum exhibits, visit the aquarium or enjoy fine art while sitting with their class.
 Posting a tour to the virtual space for all to see is also a great way to refresh your memory of the tour and share your newfound knowledge with future classes.
 For example, each year students at Bennett High School in North Carolina create a website about their visit to the state capital, and each year that website is updated, but the old versions are still accessible — they serve as a memory album.
 Blogs can also improve writing skills in students. Although students often start their blog using sloppy grammar and spelling, this usually changes due to the presence of an audience.
 Because students are often the most critical audience, the blog author begins to strive for improvement of his writing in order to avoid criticism.
 Also, by blogging, "students begin to better understand the world around them." Students are inspired to be smart and interesting, attracting the attention of readers (Toto, 2004).
 Blogging is a collaborative tool and it motivates students to extend the learning process far beyond the traditional school day.
 Proper use of blogs can enable students to become more analytical and critical. By actively responding to online materials, students can define their position in the context of others’ work, as well as articulate their own views on specific issues (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is a lovely bilingual capital of Canada with a huge number of art galleries and museums that open the past and present of Canada.
 Further south is Niagara Falls, and the north is the preserve of unspoiled natural beauty of Muskoka and the surrounding areas.
 All this and much more makes Ontario something truly Canadian in the eyes of foreigners.
 Large areas further north are sparsely populated, and some are virtually uninhabited wilderness.
 An amazing population comparison: there are more African Americans in the US than there are citizens in Canada.
 The East African islands are in the Indian Ocean off the east coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is much larger than the others and is a unique continent in terms of wildlife.
 Almost all of the smaller islands are independent states or associated with France and are known as luxurious beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the region, especially it took root on the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The spread of European influence and colonization began in the 15th century, when the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama opened a route through the Cape of Good Hope from Europe to India.
 To the north, the region is bounded by the Sahel, and to the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 For women: All tourists are advised to say that they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It is also useful to wear a ring (not too expensive looking).
 Women should be aware that because of cultural differences, they may feel that they are being harassed, women are often harassed, taken by the hand and so on.
 Firmly refuse men and do not be afraid to stand up for yourself (this is unacceptable regardless of cultural differences!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC It was used by the Romans, Phoenicians and the Moors as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name of Caz-Branca, but abandoned it after the 1755 earthquake.
 The Sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city under the name of Ed-Dar-el-Beyda, and the Spanish merchants who had established trading bases there called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places for shopping in all of Morocco.
 Around the old medina it is easy to find places where traditional Moroccan goods such as tajines, pottery, leather goods, hookahs and a whole assortment of trinkets are sold, but all of this is for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the far east of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, on the border with Rwanda.
 In 2002, the city of Goma was destroyed by lava from the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, especially the central part of the city.
 Although Goma is a relatively safe place, it is important to check the security situation outside of Goma before travelling to other parts of North Kivu province.
 This town is also the starting point for climbing Mount Nyiragongo, and you can see mountain gorillas in the wild here for one of the cheapest prices in Africa.
 You can go to Goma by bodaboda (mototaxi). The usual (local) price is 500 Congolese francs for a short trip.
 Because of its relative inaccessibility, Timbuktu has become a metaphor for an exotic faraway land.
 Today, Timbuktu is a rundown city, but its reputation attracts tourists, and it has an airport.
 In 1990 it was added to the list of world heritage sites in danger because of the threat from the sands of the desert.
 When filming the transmission of Henry Louis Gates "Wonders of the African World" on the PBS channel, one of the most important stops was made here.
 This city is very different from other cities in the country, as it is dominated by Arabic, not African.
 Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa, along the border with Mozambique in the east, with Zimbabwe in the north, and the Crocodile River forms its southern boundary.
 The park area is 19,500 km²; it is divided into 14 different ecosystems, each of which is a habitat for different wild animals.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered to be the flagship of South African National Parks (SANParks).
 As in all South African national parks, there is a daily conservation fee for the park and for visiting.
 It can also be advantageous to buy a Wild Card, which allows you to visit the national parks of South Africa either selectively or all.
 The territory of Hong Kong was named after the island of Hong Kong, a place that many tourists consider the main object of their attention.
 The string of buildings that make up the Hong Kong skyline is compared to a sparkling bar graph, accentuated by the water of Victoria Bay.
 To see the most picturesque places of Hong Kong, you should leave the island and go to the coast of the Jilong Peninsula, which is located opposite.
 The majority of Hong Kong's urban development is concentrated on reclaimed land on the north shore.
 This is the place that British colonizers took for themselves, and if you are looking for evidence of the colonial past of the territory, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the largest belt of coastal mangrove forests, stretching 80 km (50 mi) from the coast into the mainland of Bangladesh and India.
 Sundarbans has been declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site. Part of the forest within Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 These forests are not just mangrove swamps — they also include some of the last remaining primeval jungles that once covered the Gangetic Plain.
 Sundarbans covers an area of 3850 sq. km, of which about one-third is covered by water or swamp.
 Since 1966 Sundarbans has been a wildlife sanctuary, and it is estimated that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer living there.
 Buses leave from the intercity bus station (across the river) throughout the day, though most, especially those heading east and to Jakarta/Bandung, leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 As intercity buses are often overcrowded, it is advisable to purchase a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most areas are served by small Japanese buses Coaster, convenient and reliable.
 The minibus is a quick and convenient way to get to nearby places like Paro (150 ngultrum) and Punakha (200 ngultrum).
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges-de-l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 These two towers reach 83 meters in height, and the bridge itself is 378 meters long and has two lanes of 3.5 meters wide.
 The height of the stage is 15 meters. The construction was completed in August 2011, it was not opened for traffic until March 2017.
 According to the plan, the bridge will be fully operational in September 2017, when Brazilian customs inspection points are expected to be completed.
 The Guarani were the most significant indigenous group inhabiting the area now occupied by eastern Paraguay, they lived as semi-nomadic hunters who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was home to various groups of indigenous peoples, such as the Guaycuru and the Payaagu, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 In the 16th century, Paraguay, which had previously been called the "great province of the East Indies", emerged as a result of the clash between Spanish conquerors and indigenous groups.
 The Spanish began a period of colonization that lasted three centuries.
 Since the founding of Asunción in 1537, Paraguay has largely managed to preserve much of its distinctive character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best teams, as well as the best players in the world in a sport like polo.
 The biggest tournament of the year takes place in December on the polo fields of Las Cañitas.
 Less major tournaments and matches can also be seen at other times of the year.
 To find out about the polo matches and where to buy tickets, visit the website of the Argentine Polo Association.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), the value of which is equivalent to the value of one British pound sterling (GBP).
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on the islands, which is located in Port Stanley opposite the FIC West shop.
 British pounds will generally be accepted everywhere on the islands, and credit cards and US dollars are also often accepted in Stanley.
 In remote islands, credit cards may not be accepted, although British and American currency may be accepted; check with the owners beforehand to see which method of payment is acceptable.
 The Falkland Islands pound is almost impossible to exchange outside the islands, so exchange money before leaving.
 Since Montevideo is located south of the equator, there is summer when it is winter in the Northern Hemisphere, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics. In the summer months, the air temperature above +30 ° C is a common occurrence.
 Winters can be deceptively cold: temperatures rarely drop below freezing, but the combination of wind and humidity creates a colder feeling than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no particularly "rainy" and "dry" seasons: the amount of precipitation is about the same all year round.
 Although many animals in the park are used to seeing people, the nature is still wild, so do not feed or disturb the animals.
 The park administration warns: do not approach bears and wolves within 100 yards/meters, and all other wildlife within 25 yards/meters!
 No matter how docile they may appear, bison, moose, bears and virtually all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they don't keep their distance. These animals are large, wild, and potentially dangerous, so respect their personal space.
 Also, remember that smells attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid cooking or wearing smelly foods, and keep your camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The city is located on the island of Upolu and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The bay was the site of the infamous naval standoff in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the bay.
 All the ships sank, except for one British cruiser. About 200 American and German sailors died.
 During the Mau movement's struggle for independence, a peaceful assembly in the town led to the assassination of the paramount chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are many beaches here, as Auckland is located on the shores of two harbors. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore (in the North Harbour area) are washed by the Pacific Ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 Almost all of these beaches are sandy with safe swimming, and many of them are shady thanks to trees like the pohutukawa.
 In the central area of Oakland, where the bay of Waitemata is home to the prestigious suburbs of Mischn Bay and St Heliers, Tamaki Drive beaches stretch out.
 These are sometimes crowded family beaches with a good selection of shops along the shore, and swimming is safe.
 The most popular local beer is "Number One", it has a simple, pleasant and refreshing taste. Another local beer is called "Manta".
 There are many French wines that can be drunk, but New Zealand and Australian wines can be transported better.
 Local tap water is perfectly safe to drink, but if you are still worried, it is easy to find bottled water.
 Australians do not understand the idea of "flat white". "Small black" is espresso, cappuccino is served with a high layer of whipped cream (not with foam), and tea without milk.
 Hot chocolate meets Belgian standards. Although fruit juices are expensive, they are of excellent quality.
 There are a large number of trips to the reef year round, and injuries caused by any of these reasons on the reef are rare.
 Still, follow the advice of the authorities, obey all signs and pay close attention to safety warnings.
 Cubomedusa is found near beaches and river mouths north of 1770 from October to April, and sometimes outside this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans. Most sharks are afraid of humans and swim away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not lead an active life in the ocean, and their main habitat is the estuaries of rivers north of Rockhampton.
 Pre-booking allows the traveler not to worry about where to stay upon arrival at the destination.
 Travel agents often make deals with specific hotels, but you can book through a travel agent and other forms of accommodation, such as camping sites.
 Travel agents usually sell packages that include breakfast, airport transfers or even combined packages that include flights and hotel stays.
 In addition, they can keep your reservation if you need time to think about the offer or to obtain other documents for the destination (for example, a visa).
 Any changes or requests must be sent to the travel agency first, not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the vast majority of participants sleep on the festival grounds, and most of them consider this to be an integral part of the program.
 If you want to be near the stage, you need to arrive early to find a camping spot near the music.
 Remember that even if the music on the main stages may have already finished, there may be areas at the festival where the music will continue to play until late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 If you cross the northern part of the Baltic Sea in winter, find out about the location of the cabin, as the passage through the ice leads to a rather scary noise that can disturb the most sensitive people.
 Cruises to St. Petersburg include city tours. Cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements (check the conditions).
 Casinos usually make every effort to keep visitors as long as possible and spend as much money as possible in the institution. There are no windows and clocks there, and the exits are difficult to find.
 They usually offer special food, drinks and entertainment to keep guests in a good mood and not leave the premises.
 Some establishments offer free alcohol, but drinking makes you stupid, and all good players know how important it is to stay sober.
 Anyone who is going to travel in high altitude areas or mountain passes should be aware of the possibility of snow, ice or frost.
 On an icy and snowy road, the friction is low, and you can not drive the car as on a regular asphalt.
 During a blizzard, enough snow to get stuck can fall in a very short time.
 Visibility may also be limited due to snow, sleet, condensation or ice on the vehicle's windows.
 On the other hand, weather conditions with snow and ice are normal in many countries, and road traffic continues all year round almost without interruption.
 A safari is probably the biggest tourist attraction in Africa and the main event for many travelers.
 The term safari in everyday use means a land trip to see the amazing wildlife of Africa, especially in the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants or giraffes, often approach cars, so you can get a good view with ordinary equipment.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy and you will see them better through binoculars.
 A walking safari (also called a "bushwalking safari" or "walking safari") consists of a hike lasting from a few hours to a few days.
 The Paralympic Games will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place in different locations across Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only city in Asia to host the Summer Olympics twice, having first hosted the Games in 1964.
 If you booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before the date was announced, you may be in a tricky situation.
 Cancellation policies may vary, but as of late March, most of the coronavirus-related rules do not apply to July 2020, when the Olympics are scheduled to take place.
 Most tickets for the events are expected to cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with a standard ticket price of around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes helps them dry. Many hotels provide a rental iron and ironing board, even if they are not in the room.
 If you don't have an iron or you're not keen on the idea of wearing ironed socks, you can try a hair dryer if you have one.
 Do not expose the fabric to too high a temperature (which can cause shrinkage or, in very rare cases, burns).
 There are different ways to purify water, some of which are more effective against specific threats.
 In some places it is enough to boil water for a minute, in others it will take a few minutes.
 Filters are effective in different ways, and in case of doubt you should consider buying water in sealed bottles and from a reputable company.
 Travellers may encounter pests they have not seen in their home countries.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation or, worse, cause allergic reactions, release toxins or transmit infection.
 Infectious diseases themselves or dangerous animals that can cause damage or death to humans are not generally considered pests.
 Duty-free shopping is the opportunity to buy goods in certain points without taxes and excise duties.
 Travelers heading to high-tax countries can sometimes save a significant amount, especially on items like alcohol and tobacco.
 The stretch between Point Marion and Fermont has the most difficult driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Expressway, often passing through isolated, hilly, and wooded terrain.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, be on the lookout: there are steep slopes, narrow alleys and sharp turns.
 The speed limits are much lower than on the previous and following sections – usually 35-40 mph (56-64 km/h) – and strict adherence to them is even more important than elsewhere.
 Oddly enough, mobile phone coverage is much better here than in many other parts of the route, such as the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German baking is quite good. In Bavaria it is very abundant and varied and resembles the baking of their southern neighbor, Austria.
 Fruit cakes are common, apple cakes are available all year round, and cherries and plums appear in the summer.
 German baking often uses almonds, chestnuts and other tree nuts, and popular cakes are often served with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want small but filling pastry treats, try what is, depending on the region, called oladji or pancakes with filling.
 Curry is a dish made from spices and herbs combined with meat or vegetables.
 Depending on the content of the liquid, curry can be "dry" or "wet".
 In the interior of Pakistan and northern India, yogurt is used in curry. In southern India and certain regions on the coast of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 Indonesian cuisine, having 17,000 islands to choose from, is a general term used to refer to the huge variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 But without qualification, the term usually refers to food from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 The Javanese cuisine, now widely spread throughout the archipelago, includes a variety of unpretentious dishes. The Javanese prefer such flavorings as peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar) and various aromatic spices.
 stirrups are supports for the rider's legs that hang down from both sides of the saddle.
 They provide the rider with better stability, but can be a safety issue as there is a risk of foot entrapment.
 If the horse has thrown the rider but his leg is stuck in the stirrup, the running horse can drag him along. To minimize this risk, a number of precautions can be taken.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel, which have a smooth and fairly thin sole.
 In addition, individual saddles, especially English ones, are equipped with safety plates, thanks to which the leather stirrup collapses from the saddle if it is pulled back by a falling rider.
 The Coyhaique Valley is the main destination in Chile for mountaineering, and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with a large number of big granite walls and cliffs.
 At the top you can enjoy stunning mountain views. Climbers from all over the world are constantly creating new routes in its huge potential for mountaineering.
 Mountain winter sports, including skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that involve descending a snow-covered terrain on skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is a major tourist destination for many skiers (sometimes called "ski bums") who plan a vacation around skiing at a particular location.
 The idea of skiing is very old: cave paintings depicting skiers date back to 5000 BC!
 Skiing as a sport dates back at least to the 17th century, and in 1861 Norwegians opened the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Ski touring is also called backcountry, skitouring or hiking on skis.
 This involves, but usually does not include, walking up to the top of a hill and then descending down unprepared slopes, as skiing on flat terrain requires stiffer skis and boots.
 Imagine that the ski route is a pedestrian route.
 Under good conditions, you can cover a few more miles than when walking, but such speed on skis you can develop only in rare cases when you do not have a heavy backpack and there is a groomed ski trail.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it has many independent states, and in ordinary circumstances, traveling through many of them would mean having to apply for visas and going through passport control many times.
 But the Schengen area in this regard functions as a single country.
 While in this zone, you can usually cross the border without going through passport control again.
 Similarly, if you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa to each of the Schengen countries separately, which will save you time and money, as well as avoiding paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antique. Some tax authorities define goods that are 100 years old as antiques.
 This concept has geographical varieties in which the age limit in places like North America may be lower than in Europe.
 Handicrafts can be defined as antiques, despite the fact that they are younger than similar mass-produced goods.
 Reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Saami people, and the surrounding culture is also important for many other professions.
 Although this is the tradition, not all Saami people have engaged in large-scale reindeer herding; they have lived by fishing, hunting and other similar activities, using reindeer mainly as draft animals.
 Today many Saami are employed in modern professions. Tourism is an important source of income in the Saami region of Lapland.
 Although the word "Gypsy" is widely used, especially among non-Roma, it is often considered offensive because of associations with negative stereotypes and misconceptions about the Roma people.
 If a country you are visiting has a travel advisory warning against it, this may affect your travel insurance or your cancellation insurance.
 You may also want to consult other governments besides your own, but their advice is aimed at their own citizens.
 Here’s one example: U.S. citizens in the Middle East may face situations that Europeans or Arabs cannot.
 The information reports only briefly describe the political situation in one country.
 The opinions expressed are often superficial, vague and overly simplified compared to the more detailed information that is widely available.
 Adverse weather is a general term for any dangerous weather condition that can cause damage, disruption, or loss of life.
 Adverse weather conditions are everywhere around the world, and they come in various forms that depend on geography, terrain and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, heavy rainfall and forest fires are manifestations and effects of severe weather events such as tornadoes, waterspouts, dust storms and hurricanes.
 Regional and seasonal hazards include blizzards, snowstorms, ice and dust storms.
 Travellers are strongly advised to take into account any risks associated with harsh weather in their area, as these may affect any travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country that may be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for the phrase "security course in a hostile environment" may yield the address of a local company.
 The course usually covers much more in detail all the topics covered here, often with hands-on training.
 The course usually lasts from 2 to 5 days and includes playing out situations, a large amount of first aid information and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are common, but publications about war zones are rare.
 People planning to have gender reassignment surgery abroad should make sure they have valid documents for the return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports without gender designation (X) or documents updated to reflect preferred name and gender varies.
 The willingness of foreign governments to meet their obligations under these instruments is also highly variable.
 Security checks at airports have also become much more thorough since the events of September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people preparing for surgery should not expect to be able to pass through the scanners and have their privacy and dignity respected.
 Surging — a current created by waves that break on the shore, or sometimes on a reef or something similar.
 The reverse flow is concentrated in a few deeper areas where rapid currents may form, descending to great depths, due to similar underwater topography.
 Most deaths occur as a result of fatigue when trying to swim back against the current, which may be impossible.
 Once you get out of the current, swimming back will not be any harder than usual.
 Try to go somewhere where you won't be caught again, or, depending on your skills and whether you were spotted, you may want to wait for rescue.
 Culture shock is more intense and longer lasting than the cultural shock (here a shorter romantic period).
 Travelers who easily adapt to a new culture sometimes find it especially difficult to re-adapt to their own culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you are adapted to a new culture and have lost some of your home culture.
 When you first went abroad, people were likely to treat you with patience and understanding, knowing that travelers need to adapt to a new country.
 It may be unexpected for people that patience and understanding are needed for travelers who have returned home.
 The sound and light show against the backdrop of the pyramid is one of the most interesting events in this area for children.
 The pyramids can be seen in the dark, and you can also see them in the silence before the show begins.
 You can always hear the noise of tourists and vendors. The history of sound and light is like a book of stories.
 The Sphinx acts as a backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes show on the pyramids, and different pyramids are lit.
 Several countries claim the South Shetland Islands, which are home to the most bases and have sixteen active bases in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 kilometers from the peninsula. The largest island is named King George with the settlement of Villa las Estrellas.
 Others include Livingston Island and Deception Island, where the submerged caldera of an active volcano forms an impressive natural harbor.
 The Antarctic Peninsula is the southernmost part of the continent of Antarctica.
 The mountains of this peninsula here merge with the plateau, and then rise again and form a 360-kilometer-long mountain system of Elsworth, divided by the Minnesota glacier into two parts.
 In the northern part, that is, on the Sentinele ridge, are the highest mountains of Antarctica - the Vinson massif, the highest point of which reaches 4892 m and is called Vinson Peak.
 In remote areas outside of mobile coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 A satellite phone is not a replacement for a mobile phone, as you need to be outside in a direct line of sight to the satellite to make a call.
 The service is often used in shipping, including pleasure and high-speed craft, where there is a need for remote data and voice communication.
 You will usually be able to get more information about this service by contacting your local telephone company.
 An option that is becoming increasingly popular for those planning to take an academic year is to travel and study.
 This is especially popular among high school graduates, allowing them to take a year off before entering university without jeopardizing their education.
 In many cases, taking a course abroad during an academic break can actually increase your chances of getting into a higher education institution at home.
 As a rule, when applying to such educational programs, a fee is charged for training.
 Finland is a great place for boating. In the "land of a thousand lakes" there are also thousands of islands on the lakes and in the archipelagos.
 Exploring archipelagos or visiting lakes, you can easily do without a yacht.
 While the coastal archipelagos and largest lakes can accommodate any yacht, smaller boats or even kayaks leave a completely different impression.
 Boating is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for seven or eight people.
 A similar situation is found in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but in other cases it is quite unique (for example, in the Netherlands this value ranges from one to forty).
 Most individual Baltic cruises include an extended stop in Russian St. Petersburg.
 This means you can spend a few full days in this historic city, and then sleep on the ship.
 If you go to the shore only for an excursion on a ship, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 Some cruise brochures show Berlin, Germany. As you can see on the map above, Berlin is far from the sea and a visit to the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying on a plane can be scary for anyone of any age or social status, especially if it is their first flight or if they have had a traumatic experience in the past.
 There is nothing to be ashamed of: it is no different from personal dislike and fear of other things that many people have.
 Understanding how an airplane works and what happens during a flight can help overcome the fear that comes from not knowing or not being able to control the process.
 Delivery services are well paid for fast delivery. Often the speed of delivery of commercial documentation, goods or spare parts for urgent repairs is very important.
 Some routes have their own planes, but for other routes and smaller companies, this was a problem.
 If they were shipping anything as air cargo, it could take several days to unload and clear customs on some routes.
 The only way to deal with it faster is to send it as checked baggage. The airline's regulations do not allow sending baggage without a passenger, so you need to be involved here.
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay for the privilege (or, better yet, get your company to pay for you).
 However, this is not cheap - by experience, in a rough approximation, you will pay four times more than the usual economy class for business and eleven times more for first class!
 As a rule, there is no point in even looking for discounts on business class or first class for direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know that there is a certain core group of passengers who are willing to pay a premium to get somewhere quickly and comfortably, so they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The local language is Romanian, but Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multinational republic that has become a victim of ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic of Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic ties between these two parts of Moldova were re-established.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is Turkey's third largest city with a population of about 3.7 million, the largest port after Istanbul and a major transportation hub.
 Once an ancient city of Smyrna today is a modern, developed and busy trade center, located along the huge bay and surrounded by mountains.
 Broad boulevards, glass-fronted buildings, and modern shopping centers are interspersed with traditional red-tiled roofs, an 18th-century market, and old mosques and churches, though the city has more of a Mediterranean European atmosphere than traditional Turkey.
 From the village of Halldorsvik there is a view of the nearby island of Esturys, also there is an unusual octagonal church.
 In the church cemetery over some graves there are interesting marble sculptures of pigeons.
 It is worth to spend half an hour and walk around the unusual village.
 Not far to the north is the romantic and charming town of Sintra, immortalized by Lord Byron and known the world over.
 Bus Scotturb № 403 makes regular trips to Sintra and makes a stop at the Cape of Rock.
 Further north, visit the great Shrine of Our Lady of Fatima – the site of the world-famous apparitions of the Virgin Mary.
 Please remember that you are, in principle, on a place of a fraternal grave, and also on a place which is inexpressibly important for a considerable percentage of inhabitants of the globe.
 There are still many men and women alive who survived their stay here, but there are even more people whose loved ones were killed here or worked to death here, whether they were Jews or people of other nationalities.
 Please treat this place with all the dignity, seriousness and respect it deserves. Do not joke about the Holocaust and Nazis.
 Do not deface this place by scratching or painting graffiti on the objects around.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the population prefers to speak Catalan, most understand it, and almost everyone knows Spanish.
 However, most signs are only in Catalan as it is the first official language by law.
 However, Spanish is also widely used in public transport and other public places.
 The usual announcements in the metro are made only in Catalan, but unscheduled interruptions are announced by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are known to be self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 While this is often just a false stereotype, the best way to succeed in Paris is to behave as a "bien élevé" (well-bred) person would. This will make it much easier to adapt to the city.
 The unfriendly appearance of Parisians will immediately evaporate, if you show a little basic politeness.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily wooded, mostly with beech, fir and pine, and represents a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Due to the combination of microclimates, different soils and altitude variations, it is home to a particularly wide variety of plant communities.
 The area is teeming with a huge variety of different species of animals and birds.
 Here you can meet rare representatives of the fauna, for example, the European brown bear, the wolf, the eagle, the owl, the lynx, the wild cat and the hare, as well as many other common species of animals.
 When visiting monasteries, women should be dressed in skirts below the knee and with covered shoulders.
 Most monasteries give robes to women who come unprepared, but if you take your own, especially bright colors, the monk or nun at the entrance will smile at you.
 Similarly, men should wear trousers that cover their knees.
 These can also be taken at the entrance, but these clothes are not washed after each use, so you may not be comfortable in these skirts. One size fits all men!
 The cuisine of Majorca, like that of similar Mediterranean regions, is based on vegetables, bread and meat (especially pork), with the ubiquitous use of olive oil.
 A simple and popular lunch dish, especially in summer, is Pa-amboli: bread with olive oil, tomatoes and whatever filling is available, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, as well as the word Sie, meaning You, are always written with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 It is important to distinguish between verbs and adverbs.
 It also makes reading easier, while writing is somewhat more complicated because it is necessary to determine whether the verb or adjective is in the substantivized form.
 Pronunciation in Italian is relatively simple, as most words are pronounced exactly as they are spelled.
 One should be especially careful with the letters c and g, as their pronunciation changes depending on the following vowel.
 Also, remember that r and rr are pronounced differently: caro means "dear", while carro means "cart".
 Persian has a relatively easy and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this textbook of Persian grammar will help you to learn a lot of new things and to understand the expressions better.
 Obviously, if you speak a Romance language, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 However, people who know a little Spanish may hastily conclude that Portuguese is similar enough that it can be learned without separate study.
 Ancient observatories are generally considered obsolete today and serve as museums or educational institutions.
 Since light pollution was not as much of a problem during their heyday as it is today, they are usually located in cities or on campuses, which are easier to get to than those built in our time.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge structures in remote locations with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of the cherry blossoms, called "hanami", became part of Japanese culture in the 8th century.
 This idea came from China, where the favorite flower was the color of the plum.
 In Japan, the first celebrations of the sakura bloom were organized by the emperor only for himself and other members of the aristocracy at the imperial court.
 Plants look best in their natural habitat, so don't be tempted to take at least one specimen.
 Visiting an officially organised garden will also result in you being kicked out without any conversation.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to be, where it is easy to navigate and almost everything can be bought upon arrival.
 But, being in the "deep tropics" only a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to cope with both heat (constantly) and strong sun (when the sky is clear, less often).
 There are also several buses going north to Hebron, the legendary burial place of the biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob, and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you are getting on is going to Hebron, not just to the nearby Jewish settlement Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good theme for any holiday.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, cruising the sights of the Danube, or traveling by boat on the Erie Canal.
 They also define paths for popular walking and biking routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity, and it is celebrated as the birthday of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions associated with this holiday have also been adopted by non-believers in Christian countries and non-Christians around the world.
 There is a tradition to spend Easter night without going to bed, in some open place to see the sunrise.
 Of course, this tradition has a Christian theological explanation, but it may well be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 More traditional churches often hold Easter services on Saturday evening during the Easter weekend, with worshippers usually starting the celebration of the Resurrection of Christ at midnight.
 All the animals that originally arrived on these islands got here by swimming, flying, or being washed ashore.
 Due to the great distance from the mainland, mammals could not reach there, which makes the giant tortoise the main herbivore on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since the arrival of humans to the Galapagos Islands, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic in winter, you will experience what a polar night is like, when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This presents a good opportunity to see the Northern Lights, because the sky will be more or less dark for a full day.
 Since these areas are sparsely populated, and as a result, light pollution is often not a problem, you will also be able to enjoy the stars.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners are used to.
 Costumes are standard business attire, and colleagues address each other by their last name or by their job title.
 Harmony in the workplace is extremely important, and the results of group work are valued above individual achievements.
 Workers must usually obtain permission from their supervisor before making any decisions and must obey the supervisor's orders without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.36485636443201563, 'precisions': [0.6701692247146792, 0.4263054348717108, 0.29603181390575556, 0.20952891749351926], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.027871040815501, 'translation_length': 25410, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 63.135206127528875, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}